Oklahoma, session 2026, SB614.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 5017.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 5017.1. A. The Oklahoma Department of Commerce shall


have the authority to establish, administer and enforce state and


federal energy conservation programs including, but not limited to,


implementing The Energy Conservation Act of 1975 (P.L. 94-163),


National Energy Extension Service Act (P.L. 95-39, 42 U.S.C. Section


7001 et seq.) and the National Conservation Policy Act (P.L. 95-


619), except as otherwise provided by law.


B. The Energy Conservation Services Division of the Oklahoma


Corporation Commission is hereby abolished. All personnel,

Req. No. 1115 Page 1


equipment, files, fixtures, funds, furniture, publications and


supplies, and all duties, functions, authority and contractual


obligations that relate to the Energy Conservation Services Division


of the Oklahoma Corporation Commission are hereby transferred to and


vested in the Oklahoma Department of Commerce.


C. Employees transferred to the Oklahoma Department of Commerce


shall be classified and subject to the provisions of the Merit


System of Personnel Administration as provided for in the Oklahoma


Personnel Act. The salaries, grade and/or class of the employees


transferred shall be adjusted to be commensurate with comparable


positions in the Oklahoma Department of Commerce.


D. The full-time-equivalent employee positions funded through


the federal energy conservation programs outlined in this section


shall terminate upon the exhaustion of said the federal funding.


E. The Department shall make publicly available on its website,


to be updated annually, information related to federal, state,


local, and tribal energy efficiency incentive programs. The


information provided shall include, but not be limited to:


1. Information regarding ongoing programs for individual


households, multi-family housing, and any other energy efficiency


incentive programs; and


2. Information that would improve collaboration between retail


energy providers and businesses, local governments, tribal


governments, and consumers, which may include:

Req. No. 1115 Page 2


a. descriptions of the territorial boundaries of retail


energy providers, and


b. individuals designated by the retail energy providers


who are responsible for facilitating the


implementation of energy efficiency incentive programs


with customers, local governments, and tribal


governments.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1115 RD 1/19/2025 5:40:05 AM





























Req. No. 1115 Page 3